California, session 20252026, SB399.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 46600.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:46600.5. (a) A school district shall maintain a record of all requests for interdistrict transfer and records of the disposition of those requests, including all of the following:(1) The number of requests granted, denied, or withdrawn. In the case of denied requests, the records shall indicate the reasons for the denials.(2) The number of pupils transferred out of the school district pursuant to this chapter.(3) The number of pupils transferred into the school district pursuant to this chapter.(4) The race, ethnicity, gender, self-reported socioeconomic status, eligibility for free or reduced-price meals, foster youth status, homeless child or youth status, and the school district of residence of each of the pupils described in paragraphs (2) and (3).(5) The number of pupils described in paragraphs (2) and (3) who are classified as English learners or identified as individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026.(6) The self-reported reason for the request for interdistrict transfer for each of the pupils described in paragraphs (2) and (3).(b) A school district shall, on or before October 15 June 30 of each year, submit the information maintained pursuant to subdivision (a) for the current school year to the Superintendent in a manner specified by the Superintendent.(c) (1) The Superintendent shall, on or before December 31 August 1 of each year, post the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) for the current school year on the department’s internet website.(2) The Superintendent may provide a template for a school district to use, and may issue guidance regarding the procedures, for collecting and reporting data.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.